North Carolina, session 2025, SB94.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 7A-450(b1) is repealed.
SECTION 2. G.S. 7A-498.8(b)(5) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The appellate defender shall perform such duties as may be directed by the Office of
Indigent Defense Services, including:
…
(5) Recruiting qualified members of the private bar who are willing to provide
representation in State and federal death penalty postconviction proceedings."
SECTION 3. G.S. 14-7.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-7.2. Punishment.
When any person is charged by indictment with the commission of a felony under the laws
of the State of North Carolina and is also charged with being an habitual felon as defined in
G.S. 14-7.1, he must, upon conviction, be sentenced and punished as an habitual felon, as in this
Chapter provided, except in those cases where the death penalty or a life sentence is imposed."
SECTION 4. G.S. 14-7.8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-7.8. Punishment.
When a person is charged by indictment with the commission of a violent felony and is also
charged with being a violent habitual felon as defined in G.S. 14-7.7, the person must, upon
conviction, be sentenced in accordance with this Article, except in those cases where the death
penalty is imposed.Article."
SECTION 5. G.S. 14-7.12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-7.12. Sentencing of violent habitual felons.
A person who is convicted of a violent felony and of being a violent habitual felon must,
upon conviction (except where the death penalty is imposed), conviction, be sentenced to life
imprisonment without parole. Life imprisonment without parole means that the person will spend
the remainder of the person's natural life in prison. The sentencing judge may not suspend the
sentence and may not place the person sentenced on probation. Sentences for violent habitual
felons imposed under this Article shall run consecutively with and shall commence at the
expiration of any other sentence being served by the person."
SECTION 6. G.S. 14-17(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) A murder which shall be perpetrated by means of a nuclear, biological, or chemical
weapon of mass destruction as defined in G.S. 14-288.21, poison, lying in wait, imprisonment,
*S94-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
starving, torture, or by any other kind of willful, deliberate, and premeditated killing, or which
shall be committed in the perpetration or attempted perpetration of any arson, rape or a sex
offense, robbery, kidnapping, burglary, or other felony committed or attempted with the use of a
deadly weapon shall be deemed to be murder in the first degree, a Class A felony, and any person
who commits such murder shall be punished with death or imprisonment in the State's prison for
life without parole as the court shall determine pursuant to G.S. 15A-2000, except that any such
person who was under 18 years of age at the time of the murder shall be punished in accordance
with Part 2A of Article 81B of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes."
SECTION 7. G.S. 15-176.1 is repealed.
SECTION 8. Article 17A and Article 19 of Chapter 15 of the General Statutes are
repealed.
SECTION 9. G.S. 15A-268(a6) reads as rewritten:
"(a6) The evidence described by subsection (a1) of this section shall be preserved for the
following period:
(1) For conviction resulting in a sentence of death, until execution.
(2) For conviction resulting in a sentence of life without parole, until the death of
the convicted person.
(3) For conviction of any homicide, sex offense, assault, kidnapping, burglary,
robbery, arson or burning, for which a Class B1-E felony punishment is
imposed, the evidence shall be preserved during the period of incarceration
and mandatory supervised release, including sex offender registration
pursuant to Article 27A of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes, except in cases
where the person convicted entered and was convicted on a plea of guilty, in
which case the evidence shall be preserved for the earlier of three years from
the date of conviction or until released.
(4) Biological evidence collected as part of a criminal investigation of any
homicide or rape, in which no charges are filed, shall be preserved for the
period of time that the crime remains unsolved.
(5) A custodial agency in custody of biological evidence unrelated to a criminal
investigation or prosecution referenced by subdivision (1), (2), (3), or (4) of
this subsection may dispose of the evidence in accordance with the rules of
the agency.
(6) Notwithstanding the retention requirements in subdivisions (1) through (5) of
this subsection, at any time after collection and prior to or at the time of
disposition of the case at the trial court level, if the evidence collected as part
of the criminal investigation is of a size, bulk, or physical character as to
render retention impracticable or should be returned to its rightful owner, the
State may petition the court for retention of samples of the biological evidence
in lieu of the actual physical evidence. After giving any defendant charged in
connection with the case an opportunity to be heard, the court may order that
the collecting agency take reasonable measures to remove or preserve for
retention portions of evidence likely to contain biological evidence related to
the offense through cuttings, swabs, or other means consistent with Crime
Laboratory minimum guidelines in a quantity sufficient to permit DNA testing
before returning or disposing of the evidence."
SECTION 10. G.S. 15A-734 reads as rewritten:
"§ 15A-734. Arrest without a warrant.
The arrest of a person may be lawfully made also by any peace officer or a private person,
without a warrant, upon reasonable information that the accused stands charged in the courts of
a state with a crime punishable by death or imprisonment for a term exceeding one year, but
when so arrested the accused must be taken before a judge or magistrate with all practicable
Page 2 Senate Bill 94-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
speed, and complaint must be made against him under oath setting forth the ground for the arrest
as in G.S. 15A-733; and thereafter his answer shall be heard as if he had been arrested on a
warrant."
SECTION 11. G.S. 15A-736 reads as rewritten:
"§ 15A-736. Bail in certain cases; conditions of bond.
Unless the offense with which the prisoner is charged is shown to be an offense punishable
by death or life imprisonment under the laws of the state in which it was committed, a judge or
magistrate in this State may admit the person arrested to bail by bond, with sufficient sureties,
and in such sum as he deems proper, conditioned for his appearance before him at a time specified
in such bond, and for his surrender, to be arrested upon the warrant of the Governor of this State."
SECTION 12. G.S. 15A-1201(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Waiver of Right to Jury Trial. – A defendant accused of any criminal offense for
which the State is not seeking a sentence of death in superior court may, knowingly and
voluntarily, in writing or on the record in the court and with the consent of the trial judge, waive
the right to trial by jury. When a defendant waives the right to trial by jury under this section, the
jury is dispensed with as provided by law, and the whole matter of law and fact, to include all
factors referred to in G.S. 20-179 and subsections (a1) and (a3) of G.S. 15A-1340.16, shall be
heard and judgment given by the court. If a motion for joinder of co-defendants is allowed, there
shall be a jury trial unless all defendants waive the right to trial by jury, or the court, in its
discretion, severs the case."
SECTION 13. Part 2 of Article 81B of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 15A-1340.13A. Death penalty abolished.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no crime shall be punishable by death."
SECTION 14. G.S. 15A-1340.17(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Punishments for Each Class of Offense and Prior Record Level; Punishment Chart
Described. – The authorized punishment for each class of offense and prior record level is as
specified in the chart below. Prior record levels are indicated by the Roman numerals placed
horizontally on the top of the chart. Classes of offense are indicated by the letters placed vertically
on the left side of the chart. Each cell on the chart contains the following components:
(1) A sentence disposition or dispositions: "C" indicates that a community
punishment is authorized; "I" indicates that an intermediate punishment is
authorized; "A" indicates that an active punishment is authorized; and "Life
Imprisonment Without Parole" indicates that the defendant shall be
imprisoned for the remainder of the prisoner's natural life.
(2) A presumptive range of minimum durations, if the sentence of imprisonment
is neither aggravated or mitigated; any minimum term of imprisonment in that
range is permitted unless the court finds pursuant to G.S. 15A-1340.16 that an
aggravated or mitigated sentence is appropriate. The presumptive range is the
middle of the three ranges in the cell.
(3) A mitigated range of minimum durations if the court finds pursuant to
G.S. 15A-1340.16 that a mitigated sentence of imprisonment is justified; in
such a case, any minimum term of imprisonment in the mitigated range is
permitted. The mitigated range is the lower of the three ranges in the cell.
(4) An aggravated range of minimum durations if the court finds pursuant to
G.S. 15A-1340.16 that an aggravated sentence of imprisonment is justified; in
such a case, any minimum term of imprisonment in the aggravated range is
permitted. The aggravated range is the higher of the three ranges in the cell.
PRIOR RECORD LEVEL

I II III IV V VI
Senate Bill 94-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
0-1 Pt 2-5 Pts 6-9 Pts 10-13 Pts 14-17 Pts 18+ Pts
A Life Imprisonment With Parole or Without Parole, or Death, as Established by Statute
A A A A A A DISPOSITION
240-300 276-345 317-397 365-456 Life Imprisonment Aggravated
Without Parole
B1 192-240 221-276 254-317 292-365 336-420 386-483 PRESUMPTIVE
144-192 166-221 190-254 219-292 252-336 290-386 Mitigated
A A A A A A DISPOSITION
157-196 180-225 207-258 238-297 273-342 314-393 Aggravated
B2 125-157 144-180 165-207 190-238 219-273 251-314 PRESUMPTIVE
94-125 108-144 124-165 143-190 164-219 189-251 Mitigated
A A A A A A DISPOSITION
73-92 83-104 96-120 110-138 127-159 146-182 Aggravated
C 58-73 67-83 77-96 88-110 101-127 117-146 PRESUMPTIVE
44-58 50-67 58-77 66-88 76-101 87-117 Mitigated
A A A A A A DISPOSITION
64-80 73-92 84-105 97-121 111-139 128-160 Aggravated
D 51-64 59-73 67-84 78-97 89-111 103-128 PRESUMPTIVE
38-51 44-59 51-67 58-78 67-89 77-103 Mitigated
I/A I/A A A A A DISPOSITION
25-31 29-36 33-41 38-48 44-55 50-63 Aggravated
E 20-25 23-29 26-33 30-38 35-44 40-50 PRESUMPTIVE
15-20 17-23 20-26 23-30 26-35 30-40 Mitigated
I/A I/A I/A A A A DISPOSITION
16-20 19-23 21-27 25-31 28-36 33-41 Aggravated
F 13-16 15-19 17-21 20-25 23-28 26-33 PRESUMPTIVE
10-13 11-15 13-17 15-20 17-23 20-26 Mitigated
I/A I/A I/A I/A A A DISPOSITION
13-16 14-18 17-21 19-24 22-27 25-31 Aggravated
G 10-13 12-14 13-17 15-19 17-22 20-25 PRESUMPTIVE
8-10 9-12 10-13 11-15 13-17 15-20 Mitigated
C/I/A I/A I/A I/A I/A A DISPOSITION
6-8 8-10 10-12 11-14 15-19 20-25 Aggravated
H 5-6 6-8 8-10 9-11 12-15 16-20 PRESUMPTIVE
4-5 4-6 6-8 7-9 9-12 12-16 Mitigated
C C/I I I/A I/A I/A DISPOSITION
6-8 6-8 6-8 8-10 9-11 10-12 Aggravated
I 4-6 4-6 5-6 6-8 7-9 8-10 PRESUMPTIVE
3-4 3-4 4-5 4-6 5-7 6-8 Mitigated"
SECTION 15. G.S. 15A-1415 reads as rewritten:
"§ 15A-1415. Grounds for appropriate relief which may be asserted by defendant after
verdict; limitation as to time.
(a) At any time after verdict, a noncapital defendant by motion may seek appropriate
relief upon any of the grounds enumerated in this section. In a capital case, a postconviction
motion for appropriate relief shall be filed within 120 days from the latest of the following:
(1) The court's judgment has been filed, but the defendant failed to perfect a
timely appeal;
(2) The mandate issued by a court of the appellate division on direct appeal
pursuant to N.C.R. App. P. 32(b) and the time for filing a petition for writ of
Page 4 Senate Bill 94-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
certiorari to the United States Supreme Court has expired without a petition
being filed;
(3) The United States Supreme Court denied a timely petition for writ of certiorari
of the decision on direct appeal by the Supreme Court of North Carolina;
(4) Following the denial of discretionary review by the Supreme Court of North
Carolina, the United States Supreme Court denied a timely petition for writ of
certiorari seeking review of the decision on direct appeal by the North
Carolina Court of Appeals;
(5) The United States Supreme Court granted the defendant's or the State's timely
petition for writ of certiorari of the decision on direct appeal by the Supreme
Court of North Carolina or North Carolina Court of Appeals, but subsequently
left the defendant's conviction and sentence undisturbed; or
(6) The appointment of postconviction counsel for an indigent capital defendant.
…
(c) Notwithstanding the time limitations herein, a defendant at any time after verdict may
by a motion for appropriate relief, raise the ground that evidence is available which was unknown
or unavailable to the defendant at the time of trial, which could not with due diligence have been
discovered or made available at that time, including recanted testimony, and which has a direct
and material bearing upon the defendant's eligibility for the death penalty or the defendant's guilt
or innocence. A motion based upon such newly discovered evidence must be filed within a
reasonable time of its discovery.
…."
SECTION 16. G.S. 15A-1419(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) For the purposes of subsection (b) of this section, a fundamental miscarriage of justice
only results if:
(1) The defendant establishes that more likely than not, but for the error, no
reasonable fact finder would have found the defendant guilty of the underlying
offense; oroffense.
(2) The defendant establishes by clear and convincing evidence that, but for the
error, no reasonable fact finder would have found the defendant eligible for
the death penalty.
A defendant raising a claim of newly discovered evidence of factual innocence or ineligibility
for the death penalty, otherwise barred by the provisions of subsection (a) of this section or
G.S. 15A-1415(c), may only show a fundamental miscarriage of justice by proving by clear and
convincing evidence that, in light of the new evidence, if credible, no reasonable juror would
have found the defendant guilty beyond a reasonable doubt or eligible for the death penalty."
SECTION 17. Subchapter XV of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes is repealed.
SECTION 18. G.S. 90-1.1(5) reads as rewritten:
"(5) The practice of medicine or surgery. – Except as otherwise provided by this
subdivision, the practice of medicine or surgery, for purposes of this Article,
includes any of the following acts:
a. Advertising, holding out to the public, or representing in any manner
that the individual is authorized to practice medicine in this State.
b. Offering or undertaking to prescribe, order, give, or administer any
drug or medicine for the use of any other individual.
c. Offering or undertaking to prevent or diagnose, correct, prescribe for,
administer to, or treat in any manner or by any means, methods, or
devices any disease, illness, pain, wound, fracture, infirmity, defect, or
abnormal physical or mental condition of any individual, including the
management of pregnancy or parturition.
Senate Bill 94-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. Offering or undertaking to perform any surgical operation on any
individual.
e. Using the designation "Doctor," "Doctor of Medicine," "Doctor of
Osteopathy," "Doctor of Osteopathic Medicine," "Physician,"
"Surgeon," "Physician and Surgeon," "Dr.," "M.D.," "D.O.," or any
combination thereof in the conduct of any occupation or profession
pertaining to the prevention, diagnosis, or treatment of human disease
or condition, unless the designation additionally contains the
description of or reference to another branch of the healing arts for
which the individual holds a valid license in this State or the use of the
designation "Doctor" or "Physician" is otherwise specifically
permitted by law.
f. The performance of any act, within or without this State, described in
this subdivision by use of any electronic or other means, including the
Internet or telephone.
The administration of required lethal substances or any assistance whatsoever
rendered with an execution under Article 19 of Chapter 15 of the General
Statutes does not constitute the practice of medicine or surgery."
SECTION 19. G.S. 90-85.38(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The Board, in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, may suspend,
revoke, or refuse to grant or renew any permit for the same conduct as stated in subsection (a).
The administration of required lethal substances or any assistance whatsoever rendered with an
execution under Article 19 of Chapter 15 of the General Statutes does not constitute the practice
of pharmacy under this Article, and any assistance rendered with an execution under Article 19
of Chapter 15 of the General Statutes shall not be the cause for disciplinary action under this
Article.subsection (a) of this section."
SECTION 20. G.S. 90-171.20(4) reads as rewritten:
"(4) "Nursing" is a dynamic discipline which includes the assessing, caring,
counseling, teaching, referring and implementing of prescribed treatment in
the maintenance of health, prevention and management of illness, injury,
disability or the achievement of a dignified death. It is ministering to;
assisting; and sustained, vigilant, and continuous care of those acutely or
chronically ill; supervising patients during convalescence and rehabilitation;
the supportive and restorative care given to maintain the optimum health level
of individuals, groups, and communities; the supervision, teaching, and
evaluation of those who perform or are preparing to perform these functions;
and the administration of nursing programs and nursing services. For purposes
of this Article, the administration of required lethal substances or any
assistance whatsoever rendered with an execution under Article 19 of Chapter
15 of the General Statutes does not constitute nursing."
SECTION 21. The Attorney General shall, on behalf of each person convicted of a
capital offense and sentenced to death on or before the effective date of this act, petition the court
in which the person was convicted to resentence the person pursuant to this act. Upon hearing
the petition, the court shall order that the death sentence imposed by the judgment be vacated and
the defendant resentenced to life imprisonment without the possibility of parole.
SECTION 22. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to any person
sentenced to death before, on, or after that date.
Page 6 Senate Bill 94-First Edition